Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1116.
do enact as follows:AB1116,11Section 1. 48.195 (1b) (ag) of the statutes is created to read:AB1116,2,4248.195 (1b) (ag) “Emergency medical services station” means a facility staffed 3with an emergency medical services practitioner that is not a hospital or fire 4station.AB1116,25Section 2. 48.195 (1b) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1116,2,10648.195 (1b) (b) “Newborn infant safety device” means a device that is installed 7in a supporting wall of a hospital, fire station, emergency medical services station, 8or law enforcement agency and that has an exterior point of access allowing an 9individual to place a newborn infant inside and an interior point of access allowing 10individuals inside the building to safely retrieve the newborn infant.AB1116,311Section 3. 48.195 (1m) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1116,3,21248.195 (1m) (b) If a parent who wishes to relinquish custody of his or her child 13under this subsection is unable to travel to a sheriff’s office, police station, fire 14station, emergency medical services station, hospital, or other place where a law 15enforcement officer, emergency medical services practitioner, or hospital staff 16member is located, the parent may dial the telephone number “911” or, in an area in 17which the telephone number “911” is not available, the number for an emergency 18medical service provider, and the person receiving the call shall dispatch a law 1enforcement officer or emergency medical services practitioner to meet the parent 2and take the child into custody.AB1116,43Section 4. 48.195 (1r) (a) (intro.), 1., 2., 5. and 6. of the statutes are amended 4to read:AB1116,3,7548.195 (1r) (a) (intro.) A hospital, fire station, emergency medical services 6station, or law enforcement agency may install a newborn infant safety device if all 7of the following criteria are met:AB1116,3,1081. The hospital or law enforcement agency building is staffed 24 hours per day 9and the fire station or emergency medical services station is staffed 24 hours per 10day with an emergency medical services practitioner.AB1116,3,12112. The device is physically part of the hospital, fire station, emergency medical 12services station, or law enforcement agency building.AB1116,3,15135. The device is equipped with a surveillance system that allows employees of 14the hospital, fire station, emergency medical services station, or law enforcement 15agency to monitor the inside of the device 24 hours per day.AB1116,3,18166. The device is located such that the interior point of access is in an area that 17is conspicuous and visible to the employees of the hospital, fire station, emergency 18medical services station, or law enforcement agency.AB1116,519Section 5. 48.195 (1r) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1116,4,22048.195 (1r) (b) A hospital, fire station, emergency medical services station, or 21law enforcement agency that uses a newborn infant safety device to accept 22surrendered newborn infants shall use the surveillance system under par. (a) 5. to 23monitor the inside of the device 24 hours per day, physically check the device at 1least twice daily, and test the device at least weekly to ensure that the alarm system 2is in working order.AB1116,63Section 6. 48.195 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1116,4,14448.195 (2) (b) A parent who relinquishes custody of a child under sub. (1m) (a) 51. and any person who assists the parent in that relinquishment may leave the 6presence of the law enforcement officer, emergency medical services practitioner, or 7hospital staff member who took custody of the child at any time. A parent who 8relinquishes custody of a child under sub. (1m) (a) 2. and any person who assists the 9parent in that relinquishment may leave the premises of the hospital, fire station, 10emergency medical services station, or law enforcement agency at any time. No 11person may follow or pursue the parent or person assisting the parent, unless the 12person has reasonable cause to suspect that the child has been the victim of abuse 13or neglect or that the person assisting the parent has coerced the parent into 14relinquishing custody of the child.AB1116,4,1515